California, session 20252026, SB1022.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Human trafficking is the criminal expression of political and economic disenfranchisement and a heinous act that affects individuals of all identities and backgrounds throughout various industries in California. While California has made significant strides in serving victims and survivors of trafficking, additional resources and legislation are needed to position California as a global leader in the antitrafficking movement.(b) Human trafficking is a complex crime that requires action on economic and racial justice, workers’ rights, and access to safe housing and health care. In order to comprehensively and holistically address human trafficking, local governments must engage in multidisciplinary collaboration through a survivor-informed lens.SEC. 2. Title 6.7 (commencing with Section 13990) is added to Part 4 of the Penal Code, to read:TITLE 6.7. The California Multidisciplinary Alliance to Stop Trafficking Act (California MAST)13990. (a) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the California Multidisciplinary Alliance to Stop Trafficking Act (California MAST) task force is hereby established to do all of the following:(1) Review collaborative models between governmental and nongovernmental organizations for protecting victims and survivors of trafficking.(2) Map the progress of the state in preventing trafficking, providing comprehensive assistance to victims and survivors of trafficking, and prosecuting persons engaged in trafficking.(3) Provide recommendations to strengthen state and local efforts to address the issues of human trafficking, including the role of forced criminality in human trafficking.(4) Prepare recommendations for all of the following:(A) The cost of conducting a statewide human trafficking prevalence study that identifies the types of trafficking, including sex and labor trafficking, and analyzes the characteristics of trafficked persons, including citizenship, gender, age, race, and any other factors the task force determines are necessary to understand the scope of human trafficking in California.(B) The best entity to conduct the study.(C) How often the study should be conducted.(b) The chair of the task force shall be appointed by the task force. The Office of Emergency Services shall provide staff and support for the task force, to the extent that resources are available.(c) The task force shall be composed of the following representatives or their designees:(1) The Attorney General.(2) The Secretary of Labor and Workforce Development.(3) The Director of Social Services.(4) The Director of Health Care Services.(5) The Director of Emergency Services.(6) The State Public Health Officer.(7) The Director of Housing and Community Development.(8) The Director of Transportation.(9) The Director of Civil Rights.(10) A representative from the California Child Welfare Council.(11) One representative from the California District Attorneys Association.(12) One representative from the California Public Defenders Association.(13) The Speaker of the Assembly shall appoint one representative from a human rights organization.(14) The Senate Committee on Rules shall appoint one representative from an immigrant rights organization.(15) The Governor shall appoint all of the following:(A) One survivor of labor trafficking.(B) One survivor of sex trafficking.(C) One survivor of familial trafficking. For the purposes of this section, familial trafficking occurs when a victim is trafficked by a family member or caregiver, or when a minor victim is sold by that minor’s family member or caregiver to a third-party trafficker.(D) One representative from a northern California organization that provides services to victims of human trafficking.(E) One representative from a southern California organization that provides services to victims of human trafficking.(F) One representative from a central California organization that provides services to victims of human trafficking.(G) One university researcher with expertise related to sex work and human trafficking.(H) One mental health expert with expertise related to sex work and human trafficking.(16) The Attorney General shall appoint three representatives from tribal organizations from northern, central, and southern California.(d) Whenever possible, members of the task force shall have experience providing services to trafficked persons or have knowledge of human trafficking issues, including as a survivor of human trafficking.(e) The members of the task force shall serve at the pleasure of the respective appointing authority. Appointees may be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses of participation with approval of the appointing authority.(f) The task force shall meet at least four times. Subcommittees may be formed and meet as necessary. All meetings shall be open to the public. The first meeting of the task force shall be held no later than July 1, 2027.(g) On or before January 1, 2029, and on or before each January 1 thereafter, the task force shall report its findings and recommendations to the Office of Emergency Services, the Governor, the Attorney General, and the Legislature. At the request of any member, the report may include minority findings and recommendations.(h) For the purposes of this section, “trafficking” shall have the same meaning as in Section 7102(11) of Title 22 of the United States Code.(i) All reports to the Legislature made pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.